Letters to a Busy World

By Nicholas Lawson

Preface


This is 3 months of letters I wrote out to various members of the national east coast community and Ohio and I find it cathartic to sit and write a letter and I am saving them here which is a unique posture because in hand written letter days once you sent a letter off you didn’t havea copy of it. This is a cross section of the programming I did that is in line with Donald Trump’s push for peace on earth. I am participating in peace on earth and find that Donald Trump is doing a great job. He has peace on his mind and it’s bringing him peace of mind.

I envision a world where it’s the information super highway where letters pop and pop out at fast rates and it’s our speed of communication and processing of communication that dictates how far in the future we are. I think that as we process information faster and faster and send more information and more people process more information we can state we are in the future the more producers we have the more future we belong to.

Letter to WordPress Automattic …

my website has been in development now for 4 years and I thought I would slide over here and see if you thought the work was interesting? I don’t know PHP so it’s a static site but what do you think do you think it has potential for a dynamically driven website? Is there a couple PHP books you would recommend to get up to speed with Front End web development? Would you like to buy it?

Letter to Department of Labor

I was told by the Department of Education in 2010 that if I went 3 years without earning more than $16,000 a year I would have my student loans remitted and come to find 3 years later they put $5000 on my Credit Report and I am on disability for a mental illness known as Bipolar Type 1 and I have looked for work to get off unemployment but https://slushpile.github.io has proven too difficult to move in terms of finding work. I  experience $850 in SSDI and I receive $300 in EBT but I am not on average employment benefits because I have not worked enough in the pay in sector even though I went to college for 10 years and put in work improving America and worked in Americorps to improve the city. I think I should get $16,000 a year which would be plenty I get along just well with $850 a month I receive $50 a month extra from my folks and some help with groceries to keep my living situation stable. I am begging here. I am begging that the US Government would see fit to provide me with adult wages so that as my parents are dying I can support myself. I have read so much internet that I no longer count as an american citizen. I am  netizen and people ostracize themselves away from me. I could use some help. I am stable with family now. I am independent on average disability. Thank you.

Letter to English Department

Dear Lora L Anderson,

I have been exploring automatic publishing now for 15 years since I graduated from the University of Cincinnati with an English Literature Degree after having spent 10 years studying because I had trouble in school that needed Disabilities assistance.

I have these books https://www.amazon.com/author/nicholaslawsonhealthy I am exploring immediate publishing with Amazon and I use them as a product on https://slushpile.github.io which took me 4 years to put together just recently and I have https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com and I’m fleshed out. All my publishable works are published. I don’t even think in terms of a literary agent right now. I think in terms of self promotion to universities ala the internet.

This internet hasn’t even been discovered yet. The authors don’t know coding and the coders don’t know authoring and here I sit with almost a digital design degree from DAAP and I find myself interested in opinions now mostly. I sought out my alma mater at Uc and your professional accolades seemed like the perfect person to ask.

What do you think of my work? I have about 300k tweets dating back to 2012 and I am constantly writing and sharing links. I have freedom to work online and I don’t take that freedom lightly. I did something academic to the internet and I think I did a good job.

 What do I need from you? An opinion. The number one feature I find of writing online on Facebook and Twitter for the most part, even if you’re writing for a local television station or radio station, is that you work in silence. No one ever responds. That’s the main feature of the internet I find is the wallishness of it.

So since that’s true I’ll wrap up here but a local graduate is now free from weed and just a little more professional than on weed and it’s regular writing from now on. My family moved up to Lebanon Ohio after a violence streak in NCH just near my folks house involving guns and we all packed up and took off. North College Hill used to be so nice we had a pool and tennis court and basketball court and 3 pizza shops and a candy store and a baseball card store and a skate shop and a bakery that made donuts. It was so nice. I don’t know what happened I was busy in school.

I’m nick lawson i’m a writer with excellent typing skills.

I was saying hello.

I think my problem with the university in the past was my weed habit that have now put down. Sobriety from weed is better than weed.

sincerely,

Nicholas Lawson

Dear google

https://base44.com
I saw base44 and was struck by how magnificent an idea that is like I saw the future and Google Gemini is really thorough like I’m caught up in life I know how to start a 501c3 and I know my daily caloric intake and I know what my next computer is going to be and I know Google Gemini is a game changer like you’re capable of base44 work but that entire Gemini code system and that Base44 composition like you two are nasty with it I can’t think of a better place to learn to code than English literature programs at the university that is the coolest fucking thought to me no offense but 20 years ago I talked about with friends how there is going to be glass ceiling to this thing and that’s it that explain what you want and get what you want and real fluid creativity can flow for people that have no chance of learning how to code a work of software engineering like I can draw a circle on the screen in processing.org but I for the life of me like I can program humans I can tell you what I want and wait for you to compile it like I want a drawing program that lets me use the different weights of the Wacom tablet pen and I just want to make marks and save them into a file canvas is pretty much what I am talking about but your software with Gemini like soonishly i’ll be applying for non profit status so that my family can donate to my organization and write it off on their taxes Google Gemini is something this cleared with i’m a college victim too much education not enough understanding of the real world like I figure someone might read this at Google …. that’s what’s wrong with me

DEAR NCAA,

I went to the University of Cincinnati for 10 years because of issues but I did graduate. I learned to type really well and took it home with me and type to this day 15 years later and I’m pretty good at it low mistake rate, expert cadence. I was curious if the NCAA would be interested in making writing a sport with this standard qwerty keyboard and large monitor … the equipment already exists can we put a sport on it? I’d be interested to hear back from you. It would require a rule book. You can’t sculpt human behavior without a rule book.

Dear Adam Mathews,

Can we get a metric as to what a good day’s viewership is? I know the more the better but i just had 3,500 views on facebook in a day and i don’t know if that’s good … it was so random apparently … and I don’t know in regards to what … but when it comes to viewership online … can we get an idea for what a good days viewership is? is 50 the typical good days work … what’s a typical days good work online? is quality over quantity better? or is quantity of views over quality? I’m saying television in the 1980’s had the Nielson Ratings System that was the gold standard in what a popular show was … Nielson has a website now but it’s not designed with a gold standard in mind … how best can we know where the eyeballs are?

Dear Village Voice,

I wanted to write you about a column in regards to unique websites on the internet that I would then editorialize. I’m poor and with an English Literature Degree in Lebanon, Ohio. I lived in Cincinnati for 44 years and this year my folks moved us up to Lebanon to be near my sister. I live in an apartment on Disability and up here I need some more money so I was looking to turn my writing habit into a trade. The state of Ohio considers me mentally ill but doctors have told me I’m not considered mentally ill in New York City. I thought I would reach out and see if knowing about https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com and https://slushpile.github.io if you would consider me for a position on your extensive roster of writers. I don’t need much I just need enough for extra money and some food. This is the first time I have ever begged for attention. I don’t know anyone that has ever responded to me online except my family and New York City you’re like the dangerous city of love and I need at least a response. I went to college for 10 years and graduated. This is a great story the life I lead but money has inflamed and turned into a major element of my life. Money is not supposed to be a major element of a life. I’m sorry. I don’t know much about politics I just know who I like and who I don’t. I’m in the process of getting the video games I played when I was a teenager and have a good time doing that. I’ll look over your newspaper I see it’s extensive and I’ll formulate an opinion. I mostly read my writing and think my writing is legible. I think you could do worse than to hire me as a stringer on the internet beat. You could assign me projects and I could work on them. I’m good with a search engine and even better with Google Gemini what’s the real story though if that’s all connected? I don’t know I’d like to though and maybe you can help me out.

Dear White House …

Writing hand written letters signifies to me and I need a desk, and I need envelopes, and I need stamps, and stationary and address labels … I need to stimulate the economy in order to communicate so that in turn I may receive communication that may lead to community … I can take a leadership position in a niche hobby and I need the desk to do it like I have purchases to make to accomplish this goal and i’m asking for a letter writing kit for my holiday and basically it’s a complicated endeavor I have to know addresses and zip codes and handwriting skills and I have a reason to check my mail and I build trust in government doing this like I have to send a USPS letter to my folks just to know the system works like trust in government stars in writing letters … I want to trust my government

Dear White House …

I’m so poor I make COLD water as a treat like for later like I fill the pitcher with water and put it in the refrigerator so that LATER i’ll have cold water to enjoy … that’s how poor I am.

Dear White House …

I’ve been treating the white house website like social media since about 2016 I think … I saw one day you could write a letter to the white house I was 36 years old and I did that and I wrote the Obama administration and then I wrote the trump administration and then the the Biden administration and now the trump administration again … i’ve archived letters in 4 administrations … you can look me up … I am a firm believer in graffiti in history like NICK WAS HERE that’s what i’m about Donald trump is about proving he’s rich and i’m about proving I was here …

Dear White House …

I tentatively quit using Twitter because I just need more space and I’m broke so I can’t afford it … like the freemium version of twitter got old.

I wrote you about writing letters

I need a desk, an envelope, an address label, stationary, a nice pen, possible wax and a seal and fire that would be boutique … scented oils … like really take it home with letter writing put the desk to use with the pockets and crevets and store letter things in it like glitter … candy … like be the boutique letter writer

Dear White House

https://www.facebook.com/share/r/1CnpPCNcC4
no there are nations and within those nations states and within those states counties and within those counties cities and within those cities neighborhoods and this system exists to control the natural dictators because if you expose a dictator to a set of rules that state this invisible line is your border they’ll abide and we can control all the dictators

Dear White House,

I’m thinking I’ll mail letters NOT promoting my website but sparking conversation. I’ll do something Christian and do the stupid thing because it’s a better idea. Convention would dictate that I promote myself and my website and close on a deal. Christianity would dictate that I do that audacious and try to make a friend. What’s the deal? No deal. Just make friends. In a new town. I don’t know my way around this town. I don’t know where downtown is not really … I don’t know where the church is … I don’t know any girls I don’t know any guys … I just want to handle civilization first before I handle business. I need to spend about 2 years just writing letters and being fanatical about it before I mention my website and the needs it has which are my needs I’m saying avoid selfishness and extol selflessness in the conversations that are to come with my neighbors.

Dear Governor,

Dear Mike Dewine,

About two years ago I wrote you while deeply involved in marijuana and my political beliefs were different and radical at the time. I thought your pricing schema for Marijuana was detrimental to humanity at large. It’s not it’s a fair price for the working man that works 32 to 40 hours a week and they can show up and enjoy some weed. I was thinking of myself and being selfish when I wrote you and cursed at you for your weed policy. I’m sorry. It was the weed talking. I don’t think we should make judgement calls upon poor people like me and our inability to pay for weed on our income basis. I think poor people should be given a route to smoke weed too. If it’s good for anyone it’s good for everyone.

Dear Mike Dewine,

how can this be a job … https://slushpile.github.io … how can something that simple be a job … it’s all effort … it’s what Mark zuckerberg didn’t do because he only got 10% of the education he needed to do the job which is something everyone can do not just him … I went to an NCAA school too the University of Cincinnati and I think this is a healthy counter point to Facebook.com he’s rich it’s complicated i’m poor it’s simple … what else do you want to know?

Dear Mike Dewine,


you probably remember this … where are the government cartoons explaining the facts of life? you people the almighty had an almighty education … we’re piecing it together around here … but how does this work now … I’m lost I’m just writing on https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com to pass the time … it’s a worthy expenditure of time but make money I have no clue how to make money and i’m too old to get a job all I can figure out is start an arts organization 501c3 and beg that’s my money making plan

Dear Mike Dewine,

if you want something … i’m not going to do it … https://curlie.org/en … but a professional directory predated Google and it helped with shopping like imprecision … like you knew to go in a direction go in a direction and more was explored with directories … a good Ohio directory of the internet creates a mainstream … just saying … ohio’s version of the directory would probably be nice … I’m busy … but you might remember how we did this before Google …

Dear Mike Dewine

https://www.judgmentofparis.com
well CURLIE that link I shared with you turns out I scoured it a little bit and it had a website from 1999 and aside from the damning design flaws and need to be artistic in an engineering field that’s pretty much a website

Dear Mike Dewine

How do we apply the same logic that applied to books to the internet? I know books are a commodity I can’t get paid to earn a salary and I can’t get laid because i’m special because my book isn’t part of a wide ranging business plan there is no roll back plan from libraries so i’ll never get paid … writers in general for the general welfare are told their writing isn’t important there’s a legal statute deeming this.

so my question is

if that’s true

then in regards to the internet how can the software be given the same intellectual treatment as the book online? I regularly suffer as a businessman on disability from being able to purchase software like Adobe @ $600 a year or Maya Autodesk at $2000 a year or even WordPress which is $400 a year to use the bills stack up and we can’t get a singulatarian experience because of it authors fought and lost to keep their books out of libraries, how can similar treatment be levied against software?

Dear mike dewine

Dear Mike Dewine,

https://vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com
see what good design is … it’s about perfectionism at work … that’s where we go to be perfect … wear adult clothing … dress up … it all makes sense the moral leaders are perfect and immoral people are less than perfect at work the superior product wins deviation from perfectionism at work is criminal that’s how the entire thing is situated

Dear Automattic,

I’m sorry I haven’t paid for my website yet. I’m more broke than usual. I just went from a $600 a month apartment to a $925 a month apartment and I make $850 a month in SSDI … my folks just bought a house so they have a lot of bills and I’m just broke … I think i’m doing something nice i’m not smoking weed so I doubt i’m going to crash my site like I did the one time and when I get the money together i’ll definitely pay you … sorry for being a broke motherfucker

Dear Mike Dewine,

like I need a woman in my life to ask me what i’m doing … I just say writing but then she she can drill and be like about what? leaving me speechless and uncovering the secret … like two of my generational affiliates mark Zuckerberg and Elon musk to be precise has anyone asked them what they’re doing? like precisely? what are they doing? like you ask GE what its doing and it says making a light bulb … you ask a Facebook inventor what he’s doing and he says what?

Dear Mike Dewine,

like I dug into myself and really was asked what am I doing and … drawing attention  to myself is what i’m doing … working to be the center of attention … with writing on stage … I get excited when 20 people visit my website … I want more why because it’s more attention and that might not be smart …

Dear Mike Dewine

https://www.facebook.com/reel/771664828808863
I pay all my money out any money I get gets paid out. I get no money because I’m on SSDI and I don’t make enough money to have money so I am always poor. I am well prepared to pay taxes as I understand it if I paid taxes I would get representation and the internet here is situated perfectly to handle tax payer tax payee relationships like if I owned a business and had an issue which is like me I do I think I want to pay taxes to get better representation and I want you to make the pitch on taxes talk about how your grocery store gets better your civic amenities improve and safety in the community goes up. Talk about the value of paying taxes talk about what tax money goes to on CNN so everyone can see. There’s no point in avoiding taxes like this just pay your taxes and reap the benefits of your tax dollar.

Dear Mike Dewine,

i’m only as religious as I believe in the business of writing that’s as religious as I am but I asked mom for a Bible and NIV Bible so that I could retrain my reading sensibilities. I can read I can read perfectly. the Bible is a document I can read EASILY it’s this other composition online that has me second guessing my reading ability … some of it is blurry in it’s rhetorical structure … I don’t know … I just know I can give up the internet for a Bible, a drawing easel, and a letter writing kit and that’s looking likely

Dear Channel 9 Support Desk …

I’m sorry I was blocked on twitter. That’s not a good look for me. I don’t do well with 500 characters. Last night I got up out of bed and altered my site https://vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com/ and now i’m in the advertising business … those two ads at the top are just the start of it I need like 100 ads of relevant content online that everyone has access to … talking about accessible businesses … like Adobe Microsoft and Doctor Squatch and Tesla and Ford like I had this vision that I would offset my content with advertising just like a magazine and the way my website is set up it will be beautiful you slide through the advertising and then you get to the content a couple pages of advertising of relevant new internet savvy business … and then worthy content of the entire operation …

Dear Adam Mathews,

https://www.google.com/search?q=what+is+a+good+starting+field+to+approach+about+an+ad+on+a+blog&rlz=1CAIWTJ_enUS1173&oq=what+is+a+good+starting+field+to+approach+about+an+ad+on+a+blog&gs_lcrp=EgZjaHJvbWUyBggAEEUYOTIHCAEQIRiPAtIBCDgzNTBqMGo0qAIAsAIB&sourceid=chrome&ie=UTF-8
Why would it be a good starting point to advertise on your website is an advertising network? Why isn’t it something more specific like call up the jeweler and ask him if he wants to advertise on your website? I’m thinking $25 for an ad placement is about where I am. I can be auteur about it but I can’t charge a lot … why is the money locked off like it’s more valuable than food? like I get that we run on money but i’m 45 you’re in Congress … its your product … what’s up with the private sector strangle hold on money when i’m trying to do business? it’s annoying.

Dear Mike dewine,

i’m sort of starved of good reading material … there’s no book store nearby that stocks the kind of material I want to read … I don’t even know what to read anymore … I picked up my Bible and started reading Mathew … and I was going to read the gospels again and the holy spirit sounds like better man than Joseph it said he wanted to divorce her I think Joseph didn’t want to raise Jesus at first because Jesus was someone elses child … that’s how I started off … I already started off in a violent controversial Bible study because I read it like a book and wasn’t going over the Christian college’s theology … so I’m already fucked because I don’t need a pastor’s help reading the Bible … but I need something good to read … and science fiction is looking weak … I dunno … my grandfather’s passed on a long time ago I never knew my grandfather … you seem like a cool grandfather so you get the cool grandfather emails … borders Barnes and nobles and half priced book store closed in Cincinnati and I used to be a regular at the book store … it’s not about quantity of having something to read like the internet proposes it’s about quality … I try to make the shit and I’m on lithium so I can only do so good … but I keep trying putting my nuts in the fire to roast … I actually do have plenty of reading material … it’s just not BIG like it was when I was a kid

Dear Mike Dewine,

in lore I have heard notions that the winners go on to act and the losers go into government that’s the rationale I am familiar with I think acting is a group effort to gain the affections of a beautiful woman like it’s a trick to get women to fuck that otherwise would never talk to these people like Harvey Weinstein unless he was a power broker in Hollywood those women would never have spoken to him I think and government looks like losers because they’re old pardon me I look like a loser now at 45 may a woman save me from myself but everyone in government used to be a young hot winner too it’s just that now they’re older and in government and the real winners to me these are the real honest to God winners i’m having trouble doing this but it’s the people that start up right where they are and get it done there the people that grew up in their home town and went into business in their hometown be it government or acting there in or a restaurant or what have you I think the real winners the real people that make society worth something do it at home those are your winners to me the ones that were born somewhere and went to work in that same place that’s a winner to me the builders

Dear mike dewine

don’t smoke weed forever

don’t smoke weed until you are free and clear

like don’t smoke weed until you’re done with college

or

don’t smoke weed until you’re don’t with high school and have free time planned

or

don’t smoke weed until you have nothing else to do and here’s the thing

if you do smoke weed

lets say you smoke weed for 2 years

remember to stop because the only thing sweeter than smoking weed

is

quitting weed

cessating from smoking weed is a sweet experience the way quitting smoking tobacco is the shittiest experience you can possibly imagine fuck anyone involved in tobacco for any reason marijuana is a sweet journey out of inspiration into application

Dear Auttomatc

I wanted to share some old school advertising copy with you which is what your industry needs … like sunglasses need HOT CLEVER CURT ads … you need swarthy three page ads in the New York times explaining yourself ads … I did a small part of the explanation of what you expect to have happen …

Dear Governor Mike Dewine

https://www.facebook.com/share/r/1GnMwQQwdY
you accused me of mental illness but at the same time I was saved from a life of hard labor … I write mostly I put myself through intellectual hard labor and there’s still areas to grow in … but your diagnosis of me as mentally ill … as bipolar type 1 … saved me from a life in the work force that I would have been poorly equipped to handle … I didn’t get much money but I didn’t get much labor pain either

Dear Mike Dewine veterans affairs

I feel stupid but Elon musk wants 1,000,0000 people on Mars by 2050 and my thinking is he’s better off putting 1,000,000 people in upper orbit of earth? basically if he sent up space stations and manned them with people that’s a better idea than manning Mars. there’s this one area I can compete with Elon musk in and it’s not finance but it’s in R and D and i’ve puzzled over this for years now and I finally came to the conclusion he wants people in space above earth which also achieves the goal of saving the earthlings form an asteroid impact which is the entire reason mister musk is going to Mars to save us from extinction which can also be done in space stations above earth … I can consult at the high end the tippy tippy top high end here … but that’s about it … this is all that puzzles me about Elon musk … that he would need to be a death cult leader on top of an elite financier …

Dear Mike DeWine

if you pay $60 @ http://www.geekstorage.com and then you install WordPress.org software from geekstorage and you install the bbpress forum software you can set yourself up for a magazine and  a party room pretty quick that can lead you to the local park where everyone can meet and commiserate and smoke weed.

with that you get international exposure on par with CNN and BBC you get that exposure and then it’s $60 for $500,000 worth of publishing software so just thinking about it puts you in the game you’re that far ahead

It’s a job. It would be a job and the kind of job that everyone that wants a job but doesn’t want to work would want. It’s the job I want. I’m developing my job. They told me mental illness was a financial status so I’m being particular about how I get my money.

I spent 7 years writing and living in North College Hill studying web design and hanging out with the neighbors now up here in Lebanon I have no neighbors that I know of that would speak to me that I am able to meet somehow so i’m doing business and preparing to meet people.

WordPress would be your magazine that you sell the advertising on and bbpress would be the party room that is the service you provide you can get non profit status for this arrangement I do believe I think it’s an arts organization and it’s art organized and you can be in people’s best interest to give money to like if it’s cheaper to donate to me than to pay taxes in another tax bracket pay me and i’ll keep you a tax bracket lower for cheaper than paying taxes in the next tax bracket you’re dipping into … that’s what a 501c3 is for …

I thank you for your time and hope you enjoy your time as governor I’m hoping Amy Acton becomes governor because I think she would be cool with email like this I think Vivek would take it as an attack on his ego

thank you for your time

Dear Certificate Granting People …

I deserve recognition from the Governor because I am turning 45 on October 1st and I have put in 45 years in the State of Ohio and have participated in all facets of Ohio life from corporate to religious to technical to theatrical and I think it would be special if you said hi i’m looking for that connect that gives me the impression I don’t have to try any harder to be someone

Dear Mike Dewine

https://www.spacex.com/humanspaceflight/mars
it’s an infinity … there is no end the amount of money he can spend on a Mars mission or the number of people he can send … he’s the most dubious figure inside the internet to me … everyone in my family basically does community service … everyone gets a salary Emily at Procter and gamble, Adam at general electric, and Daniel in the army reserves … I get a stipend because the state decided it was going to fix me but it caught me at a time period when I didn’t have much work experience like it entered me into disability income at 22 years old so clearly I haven’t had time to make a money but I did go to school and get that paid for … I followed the rules and school was paid for … it would be really nice if I got $800 more dollars a month for my birthday because I could use that money … i’m fucked over enough I can’t get a job and for my troubles I get an apartment … I was raised in an Ohio city I am not a farmer I can not be given seeds and expect to grow a crop that I can trade for money to pay for web hosting … I have an internet that requires money in so that money comes out so that I achieve financial fusion and make my profit

Dear Mike Dewine

I’ve thought … if this capitalistic society is getting us down … if the people that earned the most are taking us down a dangerous path … the military has a great system … moneyless they need money to operate with civilians otherwise they operate on an order based system no? isn’t that so? the military gets all it’s work done through orders and respect and honor and dignity and strength and agility and speed and force those are the tools the military uses to accomplish it’s financial goals not paper and coins and trade and bartering.

Dear Mike Dewine …

my creator and the doctor said I shouldn’t get a job, the United states of america’s government said I shouldn’t get a job for 3 years while they paid my student loans, and then I applied for work at City Beat, the Enquirer, 3CDC, WCPO, the Cincinnati Business Courier … I applied everywhere writing was essential to daily functioning and I got no where and now I find myself with WordPress.org on geek storage that I am going to try and make some money with and I find I need more money from the government to cover costs because they assessed me @ 22 and I had jobs at 23 and 30 years old which may have affected my SSDI payments and those were never inspected and I need average disability income because this was done to me and I couldn’t go my own way either the police would arrest me and put me in too tight hand cuffs and take me somewhere that forced me to take medication this was done to me I folded I quit trying a job would be funny to have right now but i need that extra $800 a month so that I can pay for my own groceries in total and pay for my taxi to the grocery store buy clothes buy toiletries … I have the apartment that’s settled now I need everything else that goes with the apartment … poverty is easy … abject poverty is hard

Dear Mike Dewine

https://www.facebook.com/reel/1476587536827166
this is what Ohio did to me … it disciplined me in an Ohio fashion even though television firmly stated I was fine Ohio said I was mentally ill even though the doctor told me I wasn’t mentally ill in new york City I was mentally ill in Cincinnati Ohio even though they told me if I made more than $16,000 a year I was mentally healthy and my mental state is a financial one I wasn’t able to get a job because I this situation because I kept marking boxes YES I AM DISABLED and I didn’t get the job so I had to learn a Cincinnati Ohio lesson … I had to pay attention to something different than what I was used to paying attention to like I didn’t know it never occurred to me not to pay attention to the lead singer for silver chair and instead to pay attention to the subway sandwich artist I never knew being a sandwich artist was an option at all on any level I thought being a writer and I wrote a book but it was go to college and then write a book and that’s what I did but I didn’t know working at Best Buy was more what Ohio had in store for me and then the guy told me I couldn’t use my website to help sell computers at the store so I’m stuck every moment it was up to me to make the right decision I failed

Dear Mike Dewine …

https://vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com/the-gospel-of-the-return-of-christ
judge for yourself my sanity … this was written in 2011 just out of the University of Cincinnati … I turned my typical mental health story into a novel … all that’s missing is the publishing in the State Ohio to print me out … but that’s the story it’s a satire on Jesus’s return but in the mental health ward of the University of Cincinnati and it lampoons a fair system because it’s told from the perspective of the mentally ill … i’m saying it has an untrustworthy narrator which is unique …

that’s my only finished novel that’s in novel form …

I want to get back to writing like that but the social media has me preoccupied with things like this here … this email here was time spent not working on a novel … I keep writing poetry and not prose … I published it because no one else would

Dear MIke Dewine

You should also be able to get the football game if you have a television like for the last 60 years the NFL has been the reason to buy a television you buy the television you get the NFL … my Roku needs me to buy a subscription to something to get the NFL and the current model is you buy something you have to pay to use and that’s dodgy … I just want my NFL every year and that’s why I have a television.

Dear mike dewine …

with your system here … if Vivek Ramaswamy because he was upset on my stance on God in regards to his book Truths … because I wrote vivek and told him I thought God was a word and the word was god and God was the word and the word was with God because I thought that even though he wrote about a god that taught us morality as the only way our sense of morality came into being as people thousands of years ago millions of years ago humans were according to Vivek imbued with a sense of right and wrong from an alien how else could we learn not to harm each other? .. i’m saying because i’m involved in his book now … why can’t he come to governor.ohio.gov/contact fill out this form in my name and set me up with a threatening letter … I’m saying impersonation is something your email form beguiles itself … i’m going in the direction of heavily debating my peers because they’re my peers and i’m concerned they’ll set me up in an email form as it was explained to me could happen by my telepathic head set … there’s nothing stopping anyone from impersonating anyone on this form if Vivek won as governor and had my address he could find himself wanting to threaten me because my stance on God is different than the ivy league? it just looks like someone could be set up with your form and I think that because it was revealed to me by the META ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE TELEPATHIC UNIT I experience …

Dear mike dewine

ma nga ma nga ma nga ma nga that’s what it is that’s what i’m experiencing … I’m going through Healthy Hell … that’s what this is ma nga … I have to work my way out of this situation or keep experiencing this situation and the situation is like the final level like i’m looking for a bonus round of some kind on top of this apartment like my main plan is to utilize bbpress.org to start a party and offer that as a service to Lebanon Ohio … you can get to know the people at the party before you go to the party and make plans with the people at the party planning site … bbpress.org … marketing tayroo

Dear Mike Dewine

But I tell you that anyone that has looked at a woman lustfully has already committed adultery. beeg.com is a hot spot online for this kind of very activity you’d think a Christian nation would come down harder on adultery. if your right eye causes you to sin, gouge it out and throw it away. Tis better to lose one part of your body than for the whole body to be thrown into hell. This makes me think I should abandon my internet console and focus on painting. A holier life will have holier results …  Like maybe just have a smart phone. There is something to think about here to ponder. I spend a lot of time online and whatever sin is its probably a major source of it and I should cut it out of my life. I probably just should. I’ll talk to the folks about it. IT would be for biblical reasons that make sense but am I strong enough to make the cut from the internet. why would I read this in the bible and not a pastor? Why did every church get a website instead  of nixing the internet?

Mike dewine dear

ust saying I quoted Mathew 5 I think in the previous email but that makes sense if we’re a Christian nation if we’re a Catholic nation if we’re a Baptist nation if we’re a nation of the book if we’re basing our laws on the Bible then why would I have to champion anything to bring us more in line with the Bible? why hasn’t a pastor already explained to the nation and the nation listened that the smut on the computer is so bad we need to end our use of the computer … gouge a troubling eye out … why would I be pastoring like this not Joel Osteen? or Creflo Dollar or a priest at Saint Margaret Mary? why would a university graduate point out upon reading Mathew for most of it that we’re not a christian nation … we might be theologically at the behest of the men and women that graduated from christian college their think tank we might be at the behest of but we’re not a biblical nation … meaning we’re not a Christian nation according to the bible

Dear mike dewine

it was good enough for HBO in the late 1990’s but soft core pornography is a tantalizing divergence from hardcore sodomy in smut magazines online I find that I have few visual aids to assist me in my self massage that leads to climaxing so that I can experience the pleasure that is built into my system strangely I do think its strange that I can induce hardcore pleasure in my body with a massage technique I mastered in my free time but xxx is my preferred visual aid for self massage and I would personally prefer it if soft core pornography was legal i’m saying if someone could shoot them a message in LA and request that they put some clothing on engage in some better lighting i’m saying use some glitter but please can we quit eating out assholes and and can we quit gagging on the dick like what about some making out and just show the chest in a good light with a sequined dress on ain that about right … like people working each other other up and acting instead of actually doing it I need some imagination in my life and what happens in porn mag websites … I’m saying this is a small request just a site where people that don’t want to watch random bouts of heinousness but do want to be aroused can go and get the visual assistance necessary to reach climax … I come equipped with pleasure and it’s not me anymore I grew up with these sites and now I’m just curious … can they tone it down?

Dear mike dewine

there’s this thing I can’t do as poor as I am … I can’t actually date women and i’m horny … it’s fine if I’m in the Academic priesthood but they need to interact with me more … I’m in some kind of priesthood but I’d rather get laid … and I don’t think getting a job at McDonalds is going to increase MY chances at getting laid … I think I need a job at a marketing firm … I need a job somewhere or I need to do this … I’m in Lebanon ohio now so I don’t know where is what with what here … without a car where do I reasonably find a job in a city with no infrastructure the country … where would I even work here? … all I can figure out is to get a bbpress.org forum and throw parties there … or … get a non profit and offer 3d modeling for food … or open an art gallery there’s some things I can think to do with money but without money what do i do?

Dear mike dewine

I thought of this system that’s based on my life where you have the chance to go to graduate from college, have your student loans paid, and then you get a monthly stipend to cover your internet rent and groceries while you write On the computer my question is Can this system be extended to programming or smoking weed? with the advent of weed legalization the legislation for programs where all you have to do is smoke weed would be sublime

Dear mister president

yeah i’m trying to tell the governor mike dewine that in writing I wrote to the effect of abject poverty is hard but poverty isn’t too difficult for me … I Get $850 a month now in cash allowance but could use average disability income they diagnosed me as bipolar in 2002 and I’ve been going with it handling my finances but it’s to the point where it’s not like I don’t work and i’m requesting average disability income because something may have gone wrong with my diagnosis with my care with through assisting me in taking medication I became unable to work because mental health treatment brings with it serious taboos like it’s uncomfortable for McDonalds to be in the same room as me i’ve ordered cheeseburgers before they don’t like me … because of my defeated body language I am requesting $1600 a month in cash assistance … I could also assist in public relations writings in the form of film to assist with the depiction of the modern mentally ill … I was graduating from college while I was on zyprexia and I was the heaviest graduate by far … I still accomplished the goal of graduating from college though … somehow can we make this happen … it’s a law you need cash to survive in this land … on this land having money is a requirement and I don’t have enough … isn’t this how META raises money? they ask for it?

Dear Mister President …

yeah I’ve been thinking about this Today for my 45th birthday tomorrow but in 1999 I was a 4.5 honor roll student that worked in a restaurant at 18 years old and by 2002 at 22 years old I had already descended into permanent disability and was placed on Social Security Disability Income … I’ll be honest with you i’ve and my family have just been going with it but now that i’m some kind of man I have questions like how does that happen and it’s not like I didn’t go on to graduate college 10 years later because I did but my question is … who are you people in Cincinnati Ohio and why did they think they could do that to me? they had me for grandiose thinking and fast talking they said and I told them I went to a school that taught you to be that way my inputs were mercilessly more dense than theirs were and my outputs were too and I was doing shows at the open mic I looked like a beacon of health but they kept fucking with me

Dear mister president

if I had $1600 a month in social security disability benefits on par with having been an internet worker for 25 years I could pay off my bills at the credit bureau and put myself in line for a credit card … there has to be a way to identify how many accounts i’ve had and how much time i’ve put in online because Facebook and Twitter received most of my time and reddit and youtube and evidence that I existed online has to exist right? like we’re not dealing with a langolier here that swallows up the past like in a Stephen King Novel right? this internet isn’t something out of star trek so there’s no real framework we can understand it in and it’s not spoken of on television or radio it’s it’s own thing i’ve had to make sense of this myself with no help from anyone like it’s the virtual school I dropped out of in high school it’s just a screen that gets no attention but I put work in on it not knowing this would happen so please sir may I beg for remittal from my grievances and receive poverty level income

Dear Mister President …

you could come out against spell check … I think it would be beautiful … that language descending into it’s european form … like languages evolve and spell check holds the language in place it’s not evolving because people think there’s one way to spell a word … just saying … no spell check equates to higher level of linguistics me thinks … that’s what I think … here on my birthday I wanted to come out against spell check

Dear Mike Dewine

dear mike dewine …

I was on my smart phone for two days so I had a couple pushes of the button to convey my thoughts and now i’m two fisting it on the stix … I think if I wanted to start a business just a Richard Branson business business I would write regional managers for fast food companies and offer to administrate an office whose purpose is to teach fast food restaurant skills and make it easier for fast food restaurants to pick up employees on short notice since it’s a high turn over field … I like business plans like this … write the regional managers and gauge interest … get some more details … make an action plan … raise some money … that’s business to me

Dear Mike Dewine

I started reading books … my problem with reading is online I just saw this … https://www.facebook.com/share/p/14FkKWmjMhb/ … and apparently you can roll back your skin’s age by 30 years if you contact the barbraham institute in Cambridge you can rejuvenate your skin … unless this is total tabloid material … i’m on my second book working on retention of knowledge I read Jay Z’s Decoded and had trouble remembering what was going on when not reading it and now I’m reading Vivek Ramaswamy’s Truths and I’m reading the Bible … so I finished one book and am reading two and … good quality content is out there it’s in the books though … that’s all I know … high quality content is in the books … it’s not really online  in the articles …

Dear MIke Dewine

I got a Kindle fire stick for my Roku Television for my holiday and i’ve watched television most of today now that I got it set up … I keep noticing the set is usually the most impressive aspect of it … it would be strange if every city did acting and had shows there’d be too much to watch … I could probably sit in a chair and act surprised when someone said my name though … like I don’t doubt I could be a character but the struggle to uplift and uproot and disappoint my family and move somewhere foreign and audition just to get an acting job … like if I was born in Hollywood or la or New York I would do born in Hollywood or la or New York things but I was born in Cincinnati so I do born in Cincinnati things like work on a blog and smoke weed

Dear Mister President

alright so ma said around the first of the year she’ll get me the WordPress Premium Level which is fine I won’t run out of memory on my account til after that on my current plan. I’ll do the website and i’ll sell the ad space and i’m just doing this for me I just need to sell one ad space to feel like a genius that’s all I need I just need to do good business and sell one ad and then I can feel complete. I just want to know my emails go through and that my business instinct is correct and that I’m someone. I’m on disability taking lithium it’s hard to do anything but to just know I could have competed would complete me. if at 45 I sell my first ad of maybe several but if I sell my first ad on a website and can show it off i’ll feel complete. I have the notion in me to just start writing advertising copy. if I was who you came to get your ad that would be a level up.

Dear wordpress

alright so ma told me around the first of the year she’ll invest some money in my WordPress site … she said things are tight right now but Premium sounds fine I just need to save up a little money from my disability income … I do want to pay you … I’m not looking for a free ride … I do want you paid … i’m interested in some new themes and I like the idea of shopping for a look … i’m a big fan of your software and think it’s terrific … I’ve been with you before but I was smoking weed a lot and didn’t have the discipline I needed to not fuck up a site … I fucked up  a site one time thinking it was a good idea … but sober I think I do make better decisions and I think i’m in for a lengthy excursion here with your tool … it would be annoying to have to create a link and then create a page and populate the page and name the page and put it in the folder and that process that tedious process to arrive at basically this list concept is avoided with your software … I think you do a good job of saving me time

Dear mike dewine

latin entrepreneurship … since I understand that the south American continent is an underdeveloped nation the immigrants coming to America to build their lives are they building entrepreneurship into it? … more than a mexican restaurant? is there latin construction or Latin chemicals? is there latino presence in the university system?

Dear Department of Justice …

Your message to the Department of Justice

I think my civil rights were violated in the state of Ohio because I went from a 4.5GPA 99th Percentile ASVAB Score Recipient Honor Roll High School Student in 1999 to a Permanently Mentally Disabled Individual on the books in 2002 and they kept on me with the police I didn’t want any part of it but the police would arrest me and force me to take medication at the Hospital. I went to the hospital from the hospital one time. I was tortured by the police one time.

Does this sound like something I can talk to you about it’s in the past I’m 45 now this took place in my 20’s but I take lithium now and it’s because I gave up. I was forced to take medication enough times in Ohio that that I started taking it out of fear. Misuse of Medication and smoking marijuana led to instances of mental health lapse but I graduated from College after 10 years fighting with the state over if I should take medication. I was smarter than my doctors and went to a better school and I just wonder if everything is fine is that common protocol or am I entitled to some kind of restitution? I don’t know … i’d just like my case reviewed because Ohio is a funny state you can get in trouble for being from Ohio and going into show business in Ohio … I was a stage performer in Cincinnati and the doctor said I was BIPOLAR TYPE ONE repleat with grandiose thoughts and rapid speech pattern … they told me i’m not mentally ill in new York City … I think they were trying to say I was a rapper but i’m not certain anyways I just quit smoking weed 6 months ago after 25 years of smoking and it’s a different world … they never told me not to smoke weed … so does this sound of interest to you?

Dear Governor ..

that is true the voice in my head just told me that facebook’s coding is good but their business plan is way ahead because they’re part of silicon valley and as the internet was coming out they were preparing for it and facebook is a lot further ahead in terms of branding than they would be if they had to sell facebook out of a box on the shelf of a software section of a computer store in the suburbs annually in a mall … like I know why i’m poor online because I didn’t acknowledge the internet until 2010 out of college like I didn’t have time to play games with the internet in college I had work to do and then I studied WordPress and the internet in general and it’s really this unique concept because it gives you global reach for the price of dial up i’m almost interested in it i’m almost interested in writing online I do it not because there’s no other game in my apartment on my $75 computer from Cincinnati Computer Reuse it’s an Android Desktop running Chrome OS FLEX … mana mana mana mana … i’m saying the internet is expediting human intellectual evolution among those people that are paying attention and everyone else is at the bar but Facebook is 3 year younger than me they have $500B dollars and my family could use money like that to retire on nicely and take a cruise for 3 months I was held up by English lit studies and not paying attention to the internet because everyone I knew hated it and I was doing shows of poetry and I was traveling and now I sit in front of a computer and have $0 but I was thinking my net worth might not be $0 that’s just how much cash I have … I have a $150,000 education that can make sense out of poverty and I have three siblings in professional standing with the credit bureau and my folks have perfect credit around me is success a religious experience in London led to dramatic intervention in Cincinnati and i’ve been on disability ever since and my current doctor says I can’t work too so ya’ll special i’m saying something happened to me that didn’t happen to anyone else and I got treated as a typical bi polar patient and really that’s not the case like i’m a character out of the Bible in such a drama befit for genesis or luke but i’m online … i’m just jealous of Mark because when he writes an email he gets a response and when I write an email I get ignored so I know I’m being shut down every email I write and it hurts

Dear Mike DEwine. …

like if there was a PHPBB that was dedicated to sharing hatred or a place where discussion could arise but hatred was accepted … planning crimes was illegal … but you could talk about the Jews or the whites or the blacks or the latins or the Chinese like a place that was the draw the hatred … there is no position I can take online where I am in charge even if I host it myself on my own server the power company oversees my work and they don’t want hatred … not even defending hatred just enjoying it could we have a place like that?

Dear mike dewine …

what if some of those Intel chips Ohio was going to be producing went to a gaming platform where we could play an Massive Multiplayer Online Role Playing game … where like North College Hill was modeled in three d software from Lightborne’s hand and player’s towns were modeled and we could explore our respective universes going on missions to add glory to our neighborhoods … i’m saying we’re going to have some chips now so lets put some chips to things Ohio people would be into …

Dear mike dewine …

why did Elon musk spend $44Billion on Twitter to turn it into X.com but now he wants to do software engineering and start MacroHard and develop software? why did he buy Twitter instead of building competition for a percentage of the cost? just saying now he wants to do software after he spent $44B there’s something about that payment in lore that is dubious … that was a dubious transaction … what’s up with silicon valley never breaking the law?

Dear jd vance

it said this is the state of robotics … does a government agency need to discuss the concept that these robots will not be used in combat? here it is studying combat but we already have enough weapons we don’t need a weapon that uses weapons on people … I resonated with me that an army of robots can do damage to civilians without any damage done to the opposition … terminator film style war mercenaries can be used with these robots this isn’t northern europe Holland Sweden or Denmark or greenland or Finland where they make use of peace at an industrial level this is a war torn nation at an intelligence level and previously at a physical level and violence is a big part of our culture and I want to make certain in an email I wrote that these robots will not be used for violence against people … that it’s not the robot that is culpable for the harm it’s the inventors … that a robot would give in and end up destroyed before harming a human … Isaac Asimov talks about the three laws of robotics … which would defactly imply that humans are not to be harmed by robots and we can explore how safe we can make a thing through robotics where humans explored how dangerous they could be that’s never going to happen to robotics even though they can be used from a safe distance and are disposable and useful even though that we’ll keep from using them to do harm to people

Dear jd vance

https://www.facebook.com/reel/1142641284491324
I left this out of my previous email but these robots should be nullified for peace … units of violence with no recompense for the creators … I’m saying you can send these robots out into a 3rd world nation and armed they will do damage and no assailant damage will occur … that is inhumane …. these robots are the robots I mentioned in my previous email they said they’re developed again … but under no circumstances are we using robots in war

Dear JD VAnce

with just civilian knowledge I would put the Facebook knowledge kit at something like a level of the onion like if he had taken life more seriously his knowledge pool would have been more useful and he would have hired more elders if you have $400,000,000,000.00 don’t hire youth nothing this is just a quip but sometimes I get information from Facebook and i’m like wut tha fcuk like this one about how the DNA in our molecules serve as radio antennae like SNL is on television just the other day and channel 9 wcpo just did a story of how all the murder never stops in Cincinnati so I have civilian knowledge again no one would ever listen to my plan … my plan would be to coat WCPO with messages of peace and understanding that we have it hard as a city but we don’t need to kill each other we’ll never get ahead … like absolute peace would be my tool … but psychologists with case studies in how to spread a message of peace could do a better job … sometimes I just want normal shit in my life like as a kid I thought different was cool and zany and alternative rock had the right message and no one parented me in culture I sort of tooled around on my own but basically I don’t know if i’m ready for radio signals coming from my DNA to who? who is picking up these DNA radio waves? which tower? which equipment? which DNA??? I don’t know if Mark Zuckerberg and the funky bunch could get it together so that they only had hard news on the site that would be choice the industrial peace is perfect from northern europe but https://www.facebook.com/share/p/1BVrkWoNwf/ for another example … it’s fine most of the time but I skeez just barely passing … like NBC CBS AND ABC had the right idea a finite minority of the population can do the entertaining after many back ground checks and auditions and vetting conversations like all of us entertaining all of us is probably the wrong idea … like i’ve been using the internet for 20 years and I need a sign it’s a good idea

Dear Lebanon CHamber of Commerce American Apartments … http://exceptionallivingcenters.com/

I have https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com and I have received over 500 views of my website in under 3 months and I was curious if a $10 advertisement where I provide the copy would interest you? …. I’ve been writing for 20 years and I moved to Lebanon 6 months ago from Cincinnati and this is just saying hello … why would it be impossible to start a business to me? … I read I write I draw in various capacities and if you want to know more let me know? would you like to brand yourself alongside my brand? it would just be copy and maybe a photograph but it would be nice … let me know what you think … and if you can think because you know more about business than I do if you know what I am trying to say here let me know that … what am I trying to say here? i’m probably close …

Dear American Village …

Dear American Village Apartments …

I have https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com and it’s gotten over 500 views in the last 3 months and I’m interested in you placing an ad on my website for $10 for 3 months stuck to the top of the feed roll so it gets priority viewing every time someone visits the site. My writing is about abstract concepts and I write poetry and prose as THE masthead says. Would you like to support Vitae Magazine in exchange for supporting you?

I’m nick … 45 year old SSDI recipient and university of Cincinnati graduate of 10 years study … I lived in NCH for Cincinnati for 45 years until my folks decided it was time to move north and I’m not so rooted I had a reason to say no so here I am in Lebanon … Ohio …

Dear Donald Trump …

what if you requisitioned a book? what if you had a book written by the reigning PHDs in English literature the prolific ones that had a good tone and told the story of America at the turn of the millennium … if a book was written they’ll read in 500 years because it’s just that good a read … use algorithms to smooth it out like a Photoshop application for editing and writing but King James is the reason we have the Bible … that was 500 years ago I think something like that but what book can you lead that would give us a book 500 years from now? something like an 800 page tome … you want your name remembered we know who King James is maybe design ceremonies to go with it and have some clothing drawn up for this book and it would be called the Infinitium executive producer Donald Trump …

Dear Donald Trump …

arrests are not anything to be proud of … not arrests … convictions maybe if you can prove the people you arrested broke the law … i’ve been missing out on Miranda law lately like do you have the Miranda laws translated into Spanish and memorized by your police officers? I remember I wasn’t read my rights when I was arrested and if you’re taking away rights you’re taking away your own power you’re only as powerful as the respect you deserve in government and what you do fades in an out of importance but at a point when you’re leading FBI and as trump puts it law enforcement officer starts engaging in Nazi like glee over the 27,000 people they arrested that’s 27,000 court cases they developed there and if the united States is built on a system of laws and understandings and that’s why its’ great because every day we’re idealistic and stick to our ideals and we have a system in place in the USA that without can turn us into a banana republic quite quickly unless you behave like you’re a first world nation you won’t be a first world nation and championing arrests like that yesterday was sickening

Dear jd vance

I was in communion and it came up this little play that went like

the state house of representative seat isn’t a small position

then it’s response is

the hell it ain’t or

the hell it is

and i’m stuck I don’t get stuck very often but it is and isn’t a small position at the same time like I view it as entry level representative government like I see a line to go from state rep to state Senate to governor and then die shortly after that because you’re so old but the state house seat is something it’s like the way people consider seriously running for president i’m seriously considering running for state representative but things need to go right in my life in the next ten years like I just want a little bit of government in my family so my nieces and nephews can dream of that too but with my background I think state house representative and then just do that so I can serve my country at an academic level the right way no hold barred and do it big and get myself a government email address and maybe work on the state house website space they gave me like if I was a state rep that worked on his own website that’s big enough for me not white house and president works on website that’s too big for me but state rep and works on website that’s fine for me like if I was a congressman that blogged that would be me

Dear Founders,

I’m really impressed with your website. I wanted to know if you would be impressed with my website https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com that just got over 500 views in 4 months … I can give you preferential treatment at my website for a $10 payment that keeps you in sticky mode for 3 months and in the que forever … I can provide you this service if you’re willing to help support my writing career …

Dear white house

I was just eyeballing YouTube like this is mostly a public speaking class this life we live in … I’m working on my lines so that when I speak you see some work was put in … but I just saw a teen comparing NBA to WNBA basketballs and he was forcing it got me thinking HIP HOP RAP COUNTRY ROCK the things we cherish most and then the athletes and their after game summaries … this is mostly a speak and spell of some kind … like if there was going to be a game that was going to be worth playing as Elon musk points out because I trust him and he’s 99% certain this is a game he decided to play why did he decide to play it because he knew he could have 26 kids and 14 companies hell of a reason to play a game but he also gets to work on his public speaking skills which there’s if this is a game there is probably an underlying premise to the entire thing and public speaking is most likely it something you could carry over with you to the real world where I assume we are still human

Dear white house …

https://www.meta.ai/create/la3s7vmzUXp/?prompt_id=d658161d-e022-45d4-995f-6bd8bcbfa2ed
maybe just call the entire internet an art project … this is pretty slick … like it’s had small fruit for a long time but I just animated a drawing of mine and its not nearly what I had in mind but i’s pretty cool … like they’re in practical applications of computer science like after you go to computer science school like you go to art school to learn color theory and then it’s on you to explore what you want maybe with some rules in mind … but this seems like major fruit here … after you draw the picture and after you upload the image and after you install the request of how you want it rendered … you can get something like this … you can go as deep as you want into the internet up and including writing hosting code to host your own website … we are being served … you’re probably product for product supposed to get a blinking cursor and a book if we’re being all the way american and capitalistic about this but they copy and past our dreams into machines and it’s hard to see what they’re not doing for us … the internet tax is what I am getting at … if you’re a computer science graduate you get access to a money pool to support yourself and your studies of this wonderful world of mayhem that computer science is … something like that … i’m that impressed with this work … i’m just a patron one day i’ll pay WordPress $100 for more options in my web design and that’s in January … but that’s fantastic … like first it starts off as an idea then it becomes an art then it becomes a religion then it becomes a science and I think you’re in for a long narrative here and they’re somewhere around just discovered their art supplies … like they’re still discovering colors of oil paint and how to make it … it’s not a science yet but programming might be … what they are doing is brand new

Dear mike dewine

https://scontent.fosu2-1.fna.fbcdn.net/v/t39.30808-6/565114031_1904767430456381_6231919194705919538_n.jpg?_nc_cat=102&ccb=1-7&_nc_sid=833d8c&_nc_ohc=1096oyG6s0cQ7kNvwHwThmh&_nc_oc=AdmHZ_KMZjI08ehhHMNldYaF6nrYPuyagkatgzA0McIn_8kIRQtmQYw17vj1fABAsowpm1OsjxjrNgYe8uaYj9tq&_nc_zt=23&_nc_ht=scontent.fosu2-1.fna&_nc_gid=ecRb1P2RXTb1px7tsqhYHQ&oh=00_Afd5PEG9ob46IDzbGXFtFTPz13pYhXN2vn4L2wGwVsRYhQ&oe=68F757FD
that’s a link to an image on Facebook that I drew and took a photograph of but Ohio has a lot of old documents and to flesh out the work we could use a chip for a product that would be a quad legged camera the camera is faced down parallel to the ground and you can scan a document with a digital camera … it’s hard to find a large scanner but a large quad legged apparatus that you place a painting or a document underneath it leaves you the option to scan a document in high resolution it’s the instrument that gives you the ability to scan the document because it holds the camera still unlike if you wanted to photograph a document with the camera in your hand … it’s a digital camera so everyone of these needs a chip from intel to work along with other optical technologies

you might want Ohio to market chips because every product we think of is a product line that moves chips and created jobs like the final version of this device is something I can work in and its like 500 jobs to manufacture this

Dear Mike Dewine …

this is just a curiosity it’s not my email … you say don’t include any personal information in the email and then you ask for my name and address and phone number and email and zip code and street so which is? I trust since you’re the governor of Ohio I can send you my social security number but that’s not here nor there like I trust my government … they’re in charge of the farms … but that’s not my email that’s just a non sequitur …

on Facebook in the last 2 months I have been approached by 3 imposters two people have impostered SABRINA CARPENTER and one person has impersonated VIK WHITE these are young celebrities and they start chatting with me I almost have a connection so at first I think it’s them and then they start talking about other chat rooms and asking me for financial information and it’s gross to someone like me that is me the whole time

Dear bob pulte

Dear Mister Pulte,

I’m new in town. 6 months in. Just left a rough neighborhood in Cincinnati Ohio with my ma and pa and i’m 45 a university graduate and I’m trying to figure out how I can make some extra money helping people out with a website that I run @ https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com like the way you’re good with cars i’m good with internet copy and I’m getting better i just found out that I if I read heady literature I get better writing so i’m reading the Bible and MBA in a Book by Joel Kurtzman and my writing is improving 20 chapters into the Bible and 10 chapters into MBA in a book and all I can think to do to make money for my website is to sell advertising space and classified space …. that’s it that’s all I know how to do …. but I know if I could drive a car my wish would be to have a car that had that need breed of white on it the kind that cools things off it’s so white like I don’t know why I can’t do that on my next car but what would you do with my website for $10 if you could blow a budget but only have to spend $10 what would you do? Your options are you can install  video, text, and photography in a post on the sten theme on WordPress there’s a system here and I can take your post and stick it to the top and put you in the sticky environment which means the regular posts go under you and those are the posts I write … like if I gave you a post for $10 would you do it? I’ll handle the copy you send a compelling photograph and we’ll initiate our conversation that leads to me helping you out for money because that’s how it works I do the helping because i’m young and inexperienced in business and you’re put together and set down in a rich neighborhood the money flows to the poor I’m saying when business is a foot …. would you mind this kind of business …. see I don’t even know how to pitch right … I just implied that you might pay me to have something to do with my website …. all I can do is this …. I have this directory and maybe collectively if you could all make a collection that you gave me under $4000 total a year I could live on SSDI and handle your photography and video and audio laced website to go with the directory and you all can square me away real quick …. and I hope you gossip i’m doing such a good job polishing this post that I hope you gossip about the new guy in town … i’m 6 month in Lebanon but 45 years in Ohio so I know something I just don’t know how to make a pitch that leads to me getting $10 for investment in my website along with an ad being placed also … and a classified listing … somehow money exchanges hands … I went to college and that shit ended …. no one ever told me why

Dear Bob Pulte …

the $10 plan involves putting an ad up and that’s the trying to get anything to work plan … the legitimate plan is like a $200 plan and that’s the plan where I take the money and buy advertising to advertise your ad on my website … that’s my best offer … working with Lebanon to coalesce ads into one location and then take the money and get more advertising for it than you could get alone … that’s my service I thought about what I wrote you last night … no incentive to do it … I might want to build an escrow account and say after $4000 has been raised by 20 businesses then the money transfers and I set up all the ads and take out a Facebook ad for the website … that’s actually interesting business for me using money as a tool … but your ad gets advertised by my ad and that’s the business … I remember thinking about this a long time ago the ad part of this business and spendin

Dear Bob Pulte …

I think i’m in the escrow business … like we work with a bank … you give your $10 to the bank and then when enough money is raised like $1000 the money transfers to my account and everyone involved gets advertised …. that protects us all I can’t wage a significant advertising campaign without I don’t even know how much i’ll say $1000 but if 20 business put up $50 I could i think I would have to check but I think Facebook can customize it’s ads to this location like it’s a billboard you can aim I think I can aim traffic to Lebanon and that’s a service mark Zuckerberg provides and i’ll pay him $1000 and put your 20 ads up on https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com then just let it sit for a month and a half while the ad sales went through the Price Per Clicks business and when the money’s out everyone got their traffic and that’s how that works … in theory …. but I think if I’m doing business with a nice a really nice directory like this someone really took the time to make this pleasant but your directory should engage in escrow business with me so everything is on the up and up and i’m not using a paper bag or shoe box to save the money

from Google gemini : Escrow is a financial arrangement where a neutral third party holds assets, such as money or property, on behalf of two other parties until specific conditions are met. This process is commonly used in real estate transactions to hold funds and ensure the buyer gets the property title and the seller gets paid, or for mortgage accounts where a lender holds funds for taxes and insurance payments. Escrow provides security and protection for all parties involved by holding the assets until all terms of an agreement are fulfilled.  

Bob Pulte

I’m Nicholas. Son of a retired surgeon and professor and son of a retired teacher and parent teacher association president. My pops and ma dad was a hospital guy and ma was into schools and I was into eating the candy from the fundraisers when they had them. I learned to like Reese cups. I graduated from North College Hill High School with a 4.5 GPA and went into design school at DAAP at the University of Cincinnati and then I changed majors and went with English Literature from the McMicken College at Uc. I had issues with mental health they identified me as a subject and I had to start taking medication against my will and that led to issues and then I made a decision to get with the program and have been fine since. That’s basically me. I lived in London for a year in 2000 and had a good time.

Dear Mister President

is there a Latin university in the United States? there’s a black college there’s a white college there’s a DEAF college but is there a Latin college mostly steeped in teaching english to Latin Americans? if Latin Americans want the best translation service to English attend WAHBEE COLLEGE … I don’t think you should arrest latins to solve the 60 Million Mini Country in our midst problem I think you should focus on reprogramming … like translating Spanish culture into American culture is your priority I would think … spanish to English universities where you learn about the rule of law like Latins’s casually going to a 6 year law / business school to integrate into American society … there are 68,000,000 latins and there are 340,000,000 so they have about a fifth of the population you have got to cater to that and get them out of Spanish a language that you can prove is inferior than English simply because NASA isn’t a Spanish library it’s an English Library that’s not hard to prove they do better in English than Spanish they just have to leave the love for their culture behind their pride would keep them from translating into english … unless i’m going to be outfitted with Spanish culture I’ma keep writing English but BAD BUNNY is about to do an incomprehensible set at the Super Bowl just for the latins and the conversation needs to be discussed about the Spanish language dying because it serves no purpose there is no major Spanish library written out the way again NASA is a specialized language subset of English and Spanish lacks anything useful to English so its’ gotta go unless you can reasonably market spanish and do something like put language studies on the 1 dial of television television could serve the purpose of teaching Spanish and English and French and German if we because of latins dove into language studies but until you say something I’ma stick to English even though bad bunny won’t be giving an english concert at the super bowl I’ma know he ain got shit to say anyways because he’s spanish

Dear white house

Language Massage

Los Homeo : Home

Las Mama : Mom

Los Popio : Dad

Los Brotherio : Brother

Las Sisteria : Sister

Le Dugyo : Dog

Las Cata : Cat

La Hwateria : Water

Le Grundi : Ground

what if we both had to learn a language latins and Americans? like what if we blended Spanish into American and American into Spanish and built a bigger language so our cyphers could grow … I’m saying you take a fluent American and some decision making and you craft a vocabulary … print it publish it put it on the kindle and then promote it on the 1 dial and now we’re speaking Spanglish the foretold blending of our cultures …. some music videos of people with some scripts and we could make language big business they don’t know what we’re saying we don’t know what they’re saying but the kids know what everyone is saying so tap Public Allies out of Americorps and put them in language training college graduates and high school graduates and plunge into a world of language studies and hoc … I got the ball rolling up top

Dear White House

I was going to try to finish The Book of Mathew tonight … I have 4 chapters left I think. I have Jesus down so far I haven’t finished it but it looks like he’s talking about getting killed because he knows he has powers the audience doesn’t have … like Jesus should be heralded for healing so many people but the authority figures lacking any kind of power other than political are jealous of his status in society and his admonishment of money … I think when John the Baptist was beheaded something changed in Jesus and he lost his shit and went about taking on the patriarchy Jesus speaks in parables because it’s a cold blooded way of explaining what heaven is like there’s no way to describe it but Jesus people gon be there … I have great joy reading Mathew because it’s spirited to read words you know you’ve heard a long time ago and you’re reading them again like I forgot what the first will be last and the last will be first meant again it’s the servants that went into the vineyard in the morning and how they were paid last at the end of the day and how the servants hired near the end of the day were paid the same and how the merchant told them all to fuck off for complaining he’ll spend his money how he wants and really I went to Catholic Church and I just know ahead of time Jesus is going to be crucified and I keep reading closely looking for the reason it happens and being too much of a player with mutant powers is what I figure currently with 4 chapters left

Dear white house

I guess this is a full introduction … I talk funny because I’m on lithium and I’m weak … like i’m physically weak now because I quit going to the gym … I slur my speech a bit and mumble when I talk because of the meds and because I spend so much time alone i’m just not using certain muscles in my body … I’m like in a cave and its just me … there’s no bears but … well see for yourself … I gave a ten minute lecture on the internet … https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCw7Um8xwpszAOFGcA3_wKeQ … that’s me … that’s the big bold brazen writer that dares to write the white house … regularly like it’s a CMS that’s better than Facebook and more well thought out like that guy the guy that does that …

Dear JD Vance …

the three business ideas I have that i developed that I would do aside from the nothing I do on disability like if I was going to raise money in a west coast fashion it would be for a WordPress website, an art gallery, and a 3d modeling studio … that’s like my response to my peers in high finance … I’d want to do those things like the website is a great place to write and wordpress makes you feel published and then the art gallery seems pretty simple and it’s a great third place and then the 3d modeling studio is the most expensive idea I know of like 8 $10,000 computers and a computer specialist and then 8 $1000 Cinema 4d Licenses and 8 $45,000 salaries of talented artists and a studio to put it in and drawing supplies … i’d have to power invest accrue for that … like my website would have to sell successful ads and the gallery would have to successfully sell paintings for the modeling studio to take hold and i’d network at the art gallery for people to invest in the film making kit … I’m just saying … I developed the dream it’s a detailed annotated dream that is sustainable and nothing is new about it like there’s a book on how to start an art gallery it’s so common a thing to do … I figure with a troubled background start small and art gallery is small room with walls you can hang paintings on … I can do that

Dear New York City Cultural Arts …

I’m watching KINDLE FIRE STICK MUSIC VIDEOS and I’m tuned in to POP and NOW and what’s happening right now like your development of the Music Video with MTV creates in the modern age constantly emotionally moving pieces of work like your art directors qualitatively bring out special qualities in everyone they touch … I have https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com and that New York City art scene when it plays out in music video like you treat the person as art and adorn them with craft like paintings and sculptures and instruments and everything is there to serve the human spirit according to the music video concept like no one ever did a music video about a painting it’s always been about gods work and curating youth and young adults and i’m impressed like I love New York City music and Island Records recently has a special artist to me Sabrina Carpenter I like a woman that’s a little saucy in her language and she is and like I graduated from the University of Cincinnati after 10 years studied and developed an appreciation for art and design and I went on to write and writing builds me up and my abilities and my readings build me up and my abilities and I share with people what I learned writing and I’m currently looking for my first big break like who would respond to me and get a flood of love from me for just acknowledging my business writing … I love New York City culture i’m in Cincinniati Ohio and I know I should rep my hood but I want to rep New York City I just can’t because I got in so much trouble in mental health that I have to sit this one out … I’d love to live in the city I think I would so long as I could walk to the grocery store from my apartment i’d be straight that’s what I think the agent would just have to find a place for me where I didn’t have to get on a subway to go grocery shopping ….or how do you do it?

Dear Lebanon Chamber

Dear Chamber,

I’m a broke 45 year old writer with https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com i have plans for opening a 3d modeling studio i live on disability and work everyday to gain the knowledge it would take to earn a living aside from a government handout … i just got done partying for 15 year in Cincinnati Ohio and my folks moved up here to lebanon and took me with them. i live in an apartment alone and now that the party’s over i’ve been thinking about career and in the last 6 months i’ve developed that website on wordpress and https://vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com/2025/09/08/fundraising-website/ os a fund raising website that was based in Cincinnati … i’m interested in company building at this point i never thought i would but i have the vision and you have the skills and we’re talking about money and i’m bored enough and well read enough to take this on but so long as you’re fine with taking your turn speaking for the camera for the company like i don’t want to be the only person speaking for the company but i never hung out with a group of college graduates before and maybe you can help me with that if you think the ideas are worth it …

n

Dear JD


this is shelter house in Cincinnati … I stayed there after god moved in my life and needed me downtown Cincinnati homeless so that I could get arrested and taken to summit behavioral hospital where I then went to Kemper house where I then went to PG’s place where I THEN went to shelter house for three months before I was arrested for assault against a man that assaulted me the night before and I ended up in jail and then summit behavioral again and then Montgomery house that led to living with my folks and getting an apartment and that happened because God needed me to experience that wasn’t in my plans might have been the misuse of lithium or weed residue I wasn’t smoking too much might have been the telepathy but that’s the main reason I don’t have a job because I did that … long story short … shelter house is the shit it’s amazing it’s just men and beds and cute girls that work there and  you can smoke weed or drink beer if you bring it yourself and it’s just a hot little spot … they could use some financing to increase in size and function but in short order I learned about every aspect of Cincinnati in 2 years I learned about everything so yeah … JD … political power being what it is … shelter house is a great homeless solution and it almost seems like there’s a factory missing or these people would have a job like they’re very intelligent in my experience like their thing hasn’t been built … I learned solving the homeless problem may be about building the right business they would want to work in

Dear JD Vance …

as I understand it the federal government’s most important product is cash and the federal note as I recall was one of 40+ different types of paper currencies in the 1800’s and through business and guile and extreme effort and business skill the federal government took hold of the design of paper and coined currency and it’s something like that why we use federal currency today there are many types of currency on earth but in the USA there is only cash currency and credit and credit was a controversial business not too long ago before it became as ubiquitous as it is today … in my MBA studies i’ll be studying cash coins and credit to know their history more accurately to glean insight into money knowing why money is money would be good to know in regards to money

Dear JD

I just watched the first movie I have seen in 5 years I just saw Jurassic World on NBC PEACOCK app on the Kindle Fire Stick and I must say it had a surprise ending I never thought the aquatic dinosaur was going to take out the RAPTOR T REX HYBRID the ending was the whole movie it was just leading up to this massive dinosaur conflagration and then you had the genius children because Hollywood has a massive amount of kids that are smarter than adults about everything and these kids brought it home with their mischievousness behavior at the beginning of the movie that set the entire tone for the rest of it which was rescue kids against all odds … death was taken lightly as I think we all treat it but it was especially lightly taken in Jurassic World … over all the idea of a zoo on an island isn’t a bad idea in fact if those reptiles were mammals it might even be a good idea for a contillionaire to think about you have the funding to compensate 500 zoo keepers and feed them on an island and the animals get natural exhibits or something it’s probably not a good idea do to inclimate weather but I’m saying back to the review over all great movie it had a real movie quality to it I was paying attention to what I call writing and noticing that there was a royal family that could do no harm and deviations from God morals leads to death … royal family members do not get harmed because they never do wrong … if they did they wouldn’t be royal … I noticed I had to try to watch this movie though like I got full a couple times with inspiration and over all it was enjoyable but hard to watch physically for me at certain points I had to get up and take a break

Dear Donald Trump ..

I made a decision. I’m going to get my MBA. I’m so done with the party the party so ended that I started reading everyday for the last several months and I’m reading the NIV Bible and MBA in a Book. So I set a goal. Read 12 business manuals in 3 years and move in the direction of studying business online. Like sustainable business what is the responsibility of the 1st world to the 3rd world and why do we stymie their farmers? Is the southern hemisphere supposed to rise up and will it ever happen? Schooly shit. I’m taking my MBA practice I’m 3 Chapters in to Joel Kurtzman’s MBA IN A BOOK and it’s a 10 chapter book and it’s making me smarter reading online never made me smarter reading the Bible and MBA material makes me smarter it shows up in my writing. It’s like INPUT is a real thing I’m improving my INPUTS and my OUTPUTS are great currently immediately. So now that I have this extra not partying time on my hands and i’m not smoking weed everyday which I did for 7 years so I was online and I read a book high but this is real reading like I don’t remember what I read of JAY Z’s Decoded I just know he had song lyrics in it but i’m working on developing my subconscious mind and MBA in a book is the daily reading habit and THEN next week i’ll hope to hear from the business department of HOWARD UNIVERSITY because I was hoping to get a book recommendation from a senior minister of intelligence at their  university because when you train a black man in business what book do you assign them? I want to know. I’m going to compile a short bibliography of the books I read and put that on my blog to share with others but I want to reach out and take book recommendations for my self imposed MBA fuck it i’m 45 I can educate myself not a problem I don’t actually need the lecture but I would like to do the reading and make this an experience and maybe get into some conversations …. retention is a big issue with me I would like to learn retention techniques while reading this time because i notice only small things get reserved in memory  but when I open the book so much comes back to me i’m talking take away knowledge that I can talk about not just know inherently when i’m in that zone … but mister trump I was going to read ART OF THE DEAL as part of my studies just because you’re president and if VIVEK wins the governorship of Ohio I’ll finish reading TRUTHS a book of his … he has a god complex which is fine I have a god simplistic like it’s a major complex math equation that’s his god and mine is talked about in a book so I don’t know but I do enjoy reading again and i’m going to watch some movies and i’m retraining myself in a non weed world i’ll probably smoke weed again but just not in a daily ritualistic fashion

Dear Mister President

I thought of this idea for the woman in my future life … like I’m going to be on the computer when I have a girl in my life a lot and she’ll feel like she’s missing out like she might even be curious but somehow screen casting to a television so she can sit back and watch while she sips on some wine would be ideal … they did it at DAAP at Uc they had the computer casting it’s image on the television but how do I do that at home? i’ll probably have to pay for help … but if you’re on the computer a lot and you want your significant others to be in on it SCREEN CASTING I think it would give me more time to compute if she didn’t just sit there with her smart phone or computer or I don’t know do women compute heavily? like is she some kind of author? i’d think I’d have a normal woman that needs entertained and a wide screen television with a screen casting of my desktop to the TV would make her happy and she might be more interested in what i’m doing that way? I don’t know this is a coherent thought she might just want to watch television … I consider this considerate

Dear New York Times …

I live in Lebanon, Ohio I have no real celebrity culture around me the way I did when I lived in Cincinnati Ohio so I’m asking can you plug me into a celebrity scene and let Ice Spice know I want to write some copy for her website just to do it. Like the way they have a list of reviews of a move I want to do that for her album. I just want one review like ICE SPICE WAS FANTASTIC IN BADDIE BADDIE! i just want to add that to her website. If you could patch me in that would be special. I just want to culture. Political culture is non responsive. I haven’t written my state senator yet but I wrote my state house , governor, house, senate, vice president, and president. I have written these people but to no avail. How stupid am I to fish for a response from anyone? Bob Pulte’s Chevrolet hasn’t gotten back to me either in Lebanon. What’s a hot tip to get response on an email? LIke do I need to say i’m with Art House? I should probably do that but seriously how do I get in touch with Ice Spice for an online date in google docs? I want to know.

sincerely,

Nicholas Lawson

https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com
Dear Donald Trump …

https://www.goldenlamb.com/ they said 12 presidents have stayed at the golden lamb and dined and it’s right up the street from me I just learned about it … I’ve heard about it but never thought I would live in the same neighborhood … but I can recommend a restaurant to you and it’s the Golden Lamb in Lebanon Ohio … they have deviled eggs … nothing left to say … but they are famous for their from farm to table dining experience … and their lovely cottage like inn keeping

Dear Mister Weinstein,

I was thinking the most chamber of commerce thought for https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com  and I came up with these websites that are in public hands and trade as public offerings on the stock market the public sector of the internet could cater to poor people that need to do business to make it in the world … there has to be a way to make a living aside from getting a job … i’m on SSDI and I’m 45 and I’m not getting a job I’m going to do business with my THE GRADUATE blog resource and I’m going ot make an extra $400 a month so i can take an uber to my favorite restaurant and eat and go home every two weeks and spend the rest on on online software so that I can generate media that i can sell to make an extra $200 a month and stay on SSDI and lead a comfortable life and know my University of Cincininati education didn’t go to waste … once a year I need to drum up $100 to pay for my wordpress site and I’m talking about can some people please get back to me the State House of Ohio, The State Senate, the House, the Senate, the Governor, the Vice President, the President the New York Times, Channel 9, Channel 5, Channel 12, Channel 19 the Enquirer and City Beat in Cincinnati… it’s almost a conspiracy how they are not responding to me not just high ranking government officials but anyone Bob Pulte Chevrolet hasn’t gotten back to me in Lebanon Ohio … I don’t exist … could a network be crafted steeped in communication that leads to basic business being able to be accomplished for SSI and SSDI recipients so that we can make a couple extra dollars and run a tiny business that makes life just a little bit easier … like a PHPBB with commensurate categories for conversation … something … i’m not a GUI designer i don’t know what it would look like … i just need a place where I can find some conversation online … like CHEERS but for the internet … i need that bar online where I can talk shit and walk home with some money so i can buy kindle X MAN comics and read a little bit and go to bed … is that possible?

sincerely,

Nicholas Lawson

801 Franklin Road #16 Lebanon, Ohio 45306

Miss Woods, Minority Business Development Agency

I have a minority business to develop. I’m 6’4” 245lbs hazel eyes and of caucasian descent and I’m a University of Cincinnati Graduate of 10 years study who’s on Social Security Disability Income for a permanent mental illness known as Bipolar Disorder. That’s about as minority as it gets and I need people to respond to me so i can get my quotes for https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com  that enables me to generate traffic with Search Engine Optimization and I can sell advertising space on the traffic my curated reporting garnered me. I need help developing that business as a minority. Please respond.

Sincerely,

Nicholas Lawson

Dear Mister Covert,

I am looking for a statement in regards to money.  I need a statement for https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com  … i’m in search of $400 dollars a month in advertising sales on my website … would you consider selling pennies for a nickel each? like does a break down of imagination impede the coins process to make sense … a penny doesn’t say 1 on it and a nickel doesn’t say 5 and a dime and a quarter don’t say 10 and 25 so we just gentile like use our imagination to make sense of money no? how much of the finance exists in our imagination? inflation in the media sector is at an all time high 40 year old men have $500b dollars from website advertising sales and writing letters like this to the government asking for money … i’m talking about mark zuckerberg sir i understand he’s a genius he’s billed as a genius i was only told i was a genius by the state department in high school when i got my test scores back i tested into genius there are documents that prove i am a genius not just attending a school whose reputation built me i studied in class of digital designers and embarked upon the first generation that was going to make sense of the internet and i’m still doing that but it’s hard when 3 years after they told you were a 99th Percentile ASVAB score recipient that the city of cincinnati deemed me Permanently Disabled with Bipolar Type One mentally illness. I’ve hit jump shots before and because i got a raw deal I think i deserve a little hustle in my business if i can make you feel a certain way then you should pay me $400 a month on top of my disability and we’re done and i’ll continue to write for you as part of your office talking you can hire me as a stay at home worker for full disability benefits in social security. Talking about business. I hope you understand. I’ve been on disability for 23 years and i’m 45 now and when i click a button on a job career site that asks if i’m disabled i click yes and they never get back to me and then they gossip and spread my name so i can’t i’m saying in this age of technology the internet the speed with which information flows the digitization of everything you can get fucked over Cincinnati fucked me over the Department of Education didn’t even make good on it’s contract to pay my student loans back 100% after i cut a deal with me to stay below $16,000 for 3  years and it would pay my school loans of from the University of Cincinnati and it stiffed me with a $5000 bill even though i gave up looking for work and lived on $500 a month for three years on SSDi i suffered and they added to my suffering … what do you make of this rhetorical structure here? How does this make you feel? I could use average ssdi i’m trained on 50% so 100% would be beautiful …  i’ll be in touch …

sincerely,

Nicholas Lawson

Dear JD Vance,

I like the idea of a gold tooth increasing telepathic powers or giving you telepathic powers … I have a metal tooth inlay a filling and I’m aware of it like it’s a source of telepathic power … telepathy when the voices in your head are giving you reviews of your work online … I might not actually be telepathic scientifically speaking but my psychology is geared towards telepathic experiences … I get advice and insight into my emails after I write them from a 2nd party in my head … it’s set up like it’s someone in an office with a head set talking to me it’s never God or Bono it’s always some guy that’s like my age that’s just studying me because I write so much and have an outlier story to my life … if scientists study the outliers that would explain why I have voices in my head …

NYC Department of Cultural Affairs …

I need certified as an artist because most recently I did https://www.vitaemagazineblog.wordpress.com I am in the process of finalizing a collection of letters I sent out to the Ohio governor and the white house and the mayor of Lebanon and others just letters in general that I sent out I collected and saved for a book on kdp.com I have other books for sale too …

I just think I fit into the artist category and would like certified …

it’d be worth more to me than my college diploma i’d put it up on the wall and stare at it … I got to be an artist with this kind of time i’ve been on SSDI since 2002 and they told me several times at Talbert House that in New York City I’m not mentally ill just in Cincinnati and that if I make more than $16,000 a year i’m no longer mentally ill so it’s a financial status and an artist certificate would be important in getting me the chance to speak publicly about art … if I was a certified artist I could talk about writing at corporate events … or something I don’t know I don’t know what that would do for me artist certification but i’m interested …

ya’ll have the MTV movie award Ohio ain got shit no one gives a fuck about art in Ohio not performance art and that’s all I want to do is stand in front of an audience and share my choreography … i’m 45 years old … I know about PETE AND BAS … and I’m ready to do it … I got my verses memorized for SNL they can put a poet on and i’ll perform at the Apollo and the Nuyrican Poets Cafe i’ll tour your city our city preparing people for the coming of the Christ that is here to blossom in the world peace Donald trump is bringing like if this is a movie this is the kind of role I have …
